BizarroBalangao.xfst
# Both within and across morpheme boundaries
define Shuffle a e (->) e a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, e a (->) a e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a i (->) i a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, i a (->) a i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a I (->) I a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, I a (->) a I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a o (->) o a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, o a (->) a o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a u (->) u a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u a (->) a u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
e i (->) i e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, i e (->) e i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
e I (->) I e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, I e (->) e I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
e o (->) o e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, o e (->) e o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
e u (->) u e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u e (->) e u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
i I (->) I i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, I i (->) i I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
i o (->) o i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, o i (->) i o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
i u (->) u i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u i (->) i u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
I o (->) o I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, o I (->) I o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
I u (->) u I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u I (->) I u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
o u (->) u o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u o (->) o u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a e (->) e a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, e a (->) a e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ i (->) i %+ a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, i %+ a (->) a %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ I (->) I %+ a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, I %+ a (->) a %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ o (->) o %+ a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, o %+ a (->) a %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ u (->) u %+ a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ a (->) a %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ i (->) i %+ e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, i %+ e (->) e %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ I (->) I %+ e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, I %+ e (->) e %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ o (->) o %+ e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, o %+ e (->) e %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ u (->) u %+ e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ e (->) e %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ I (->) I %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, I %+ i (->) i %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ o (->) o %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, o %+ i (->) i %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ u (->) u %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ i (->) i %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ o (->) o %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, o %+ I (->) I %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ u (->) u %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ I (->) I %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ u (->) u %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ o (->) o %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
h q (->) q h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, q h (->) h q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
h b (->) b h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, h d (->) d h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
h g (->) g h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
g h (->) h g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, d h (->) h d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
b h (->) h b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
h t (->) t h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t h (->) h t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
h k (->) k h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k h (->) h k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
h p (->) p h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, p h (->) h p %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
q b (->) b q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, q d (->) d q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
q g (->) g q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph %+MetWithinMorph, 
g q (->) q g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, d q (->) q d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
b q (->) q b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph %+MetWithinMorph,
q t (->) t q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t q (->) q t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
q k (->) k q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k q (->) q k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
q p (->) p q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, p q (->) q p %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
b d (->) d b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, b g (->) g b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
g b (->) b g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, d b (->) b d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
b t (->) t b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t b (->) b t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
b k (->) k b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k b (->) b k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
d g (->) g d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, g d (->) d g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
d t (->) t d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t d (->) d t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
d k (->) k d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k d (->) d k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
g t (->) t g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t g (->) g t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
g k (->) k g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k g (->) g k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
k t (->) t k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t k (->) k t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
h %+ q (->) q %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ h (->) h %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
h %+ b (->) b %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ d (->) d %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ g (->) g %+ h %+MetBetweenMorph, 
g %+ h (->) h %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ h (->) h %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ h (->) h %+ b %+MetBetweenMorph, 
h %+ t (->) t %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ h (->) h %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
h %+ k (->) k %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ h (->) h %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
h %+ p (->) p %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ h (->) h %+ p %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
q %+ b (->) b %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ d (->) d %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ g (->) g %+ q %+MetBetweenMorph, 
g %+ q (->) q %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ q (->) q %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ q (->) q %+ b %+MetBetweenMorph,
q %+ t (->) t %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ q (->) q %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
q %+ k (->) k %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ q (->) q %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
q %+ p (->) p %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ q (->) q %+ p %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
b %+ d (->) d %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ g (->) g %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, 
g %+ b (->) b %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ b (->) b %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, 
b %+ t (->) t %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ b (->) b %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
b %+ k (->) k %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ b (->) b %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
d %+ g (->) g %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ d (->) d %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, 
d %+ t (->) t %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ d (->) d %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
d %+ k (->) k %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ d (->) d %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
g %+ t (->) t %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ g (->) g %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
g %+ k (->) k %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ g (->) g %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
k %+ t (->) t %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ k (->) k %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
a b (->) b a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b a (->) a b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a d (->) d a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d a (->) a d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a g (->) g a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g a (->) a g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a h (->) h a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h a (->) a h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a k (->) k a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k a (->) a k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a p (->) p a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p a (->) a p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a q (->) q a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q a (->) a q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a t (->) t a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t a (->) a t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e b (->) b e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b e (->) e b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e d (->) d e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d e (->) e d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e g (->) g e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g e (->) e g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e h (->) h e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h e (->) e h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e k (->) k e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k e (->) e k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e p (->) p e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p e (->) e p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e q (->) q e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q e (->) e q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e t (->) t e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t e (->) e t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I b (->) b I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b I (->) I b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I d (->) d I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d I (->) I d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I g (->) g I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g I (->) I g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I h (->) h I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h I (->) I h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I k (->) k I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k I (->) I k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I p (->) p I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p I (->) I p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I q (->) q I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q I (->) I q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
I t (->) t I %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t I (->) I t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o b (->) b o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b o (->) o b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o d (->) d o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d o (->) o d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o g (->) g o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g o (->) o g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o h (->) h o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h o (->) o h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o k (->) k o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k o (->) o k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o p (->) p o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p o (->) o p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o q (->) q o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q o (->) o q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
o t (->) t o %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t o (->) o t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u b (->) b u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b u (->) u b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u d (->) d u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d u (->) u d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u g (->) g u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g u (->) u g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u h (->) h u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h u (->) u h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u k (->) k u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k u (->) u k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u p (->) p u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p u (->) u p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u q (->) q u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q u (->) u q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
u t (->) t u %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t u (->) u t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a %+ b (->) b %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ a (->) a %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ d (->) d %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ a (->) a %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ g (->) g %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ a (->) a %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ h (->) h %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ a (->) a %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ k (->) k %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ a (->) a %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ p (->) p %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ a (->) a %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ q (->) q %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ a (->) a %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ t (->) t %+ a %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ a (->) a %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ b (->) b %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ e (->) e %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ d (->) d %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ e (->) e %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ g (->) g %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ e (->) e %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ h (->) h %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ e (->) e %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ k (->) k %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ e (->) e %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ p (->) p %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ e (->) e %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ q (->) q %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ e (->) e %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ t (->) t %+ e %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ e (->) e %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ b (->) b %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ i (->) i %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ d (->) d %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ i (->) i %+ d %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ g (->) g %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ i (->) i %+ g %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ h (->) h %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ i (->) i %+ h %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ k (->) k %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ i (->) i %+ k %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ p (->) p %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ i (->) i %+ p %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ q (->) q %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ i (->) i %+ q %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ t (->) t %+ i %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ i (->) i %+ t %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ b (->) b %+ I %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ I (->) I %+ b %+MetCV %+MetBetweenMorph,
